California, session 20252026, AB2759.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12023 of the Food and Agricultural Code is amended to read:12023. An agricultural pest control adviser license may be refused or may be revoked or suspended by the director as necessary to carry out the purposes of this division. Cause for refusal, revocation, or suspension shall include, but shall not be limited to to, all of the following:(a) Failure to put a recommendation in writing.(b) The making of false or fraudulent statements in any written recommendation.(c) Failure or refusal to comply with any provision of this chapter, or any other regulation adopted by the agricultural commissioner.(d) Failure or refusal to comply with any provisions of this division or of Division 7 (commencing with Section 12501) 12500) relating to pesticides or a regulation of the department adopted pursuant to such those provisions.(e) Failure to qualify by examination in at least one of the categories in Section 12022.(f) Unprofessional conduct, as defined in Section 12023.5.